Missouri, session 2026, HB1881.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 195.017, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
2 thereof, to be known as section 195.017, to read as follows:
195.017. 1. The department of health and senior services shall place a substance in
2 Schedule I if it finds that the substance:
3 (1) Has high potential for abuse; and
4 (2) Has no accepted medical use in treatment in the United States or lacks accepted
5 safety for use in treatment under medical supervision.
6 2. Schedule I:
7 (1) The controlled substances listed in this subsection are included in Schedule I;
8 (2) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
9 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of
10 these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:
11 (a) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-(1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-N-
12 phenylacetamide);
13 (b) Acetylmethadol;
14 (c) Acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide);
15 (d) Acryl fentanyl (-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacrylamide);
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1881 2
16 (e) AH-7921(3,4-dichloro-N-[(1-dimethylamino) cyclohexylmethyl] benzamide);
17 (f) Allylprodine;
18 (g) Alphacetylmethadol (except levoalphacetylmethadol, also known as levo-alpha-
19 acetylmethadol levothadyl acetate or LAAM);
20 (h) Alphameprodine;
21 (i) Alphamethadol;
22 (j) Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-1-(alphamethyl-beta-phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl)
23 propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4 ((N-propanilido) piperidine);
24 (k) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-(1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl) ethyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-
25 phenylpropanamide);
26 (l) Benzethidine;
27 (m) Betacetylmethadol;
28 (n) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-N-
29 phenylpropanamide);
30 (o) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-
31 piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);
32 (p) Betameprodine;
33 (q) Betamethadol;
34 (r) Betaprodine;
35 (s) Clonitazene;
36 (t) Dextromoramide;
37 (u) Diampromide;
38 (v) Cyclopropyl fentanyl;
39 (w) Diethylthiambutene;
40 (x) Difenoxin;
41 (y) Dimenoxadol;
42 (z) Dimepheptanol;
43 (aa) Dimethylthiambutene;
44 (bb) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
45 (cc) Dipipanone;
46 (dd) Ethylmethylthiambutene;
47 (ee) Etonitazene;
48 (ff) Etoxeridine;
49 (gg) 4-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl -(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)
50 isobutyramide;
51 (hh) Furanyl fentanyl -(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-2-carboxamide;
52 (ii) Furethidine;

HB 1881 3
53 (jj) Hydroxypethidine;
54 (kk) Ketobemidone;
55 (ll) Levomoramide;
56 (mm) Levophenacylmorphan;
57 (nn) 3-Methylfentanyl (N-(3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl)-N-
58 phenylproanamide), its optical and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
59 (oo) 3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-((3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-
60 phenylpropanamide);
61 (pp) Methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
62 phenylacetamide);
63 (qq) Morpheridine;
64 (rr) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);
65 (ss) MT-45(1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl) piperazine);
66 (tt) Noracymethadol;
67 (uu) Norlevorphanol;
68 (vv) Normethadone;
69 (ww) Norpipanone;
70 (xx) Ocfentanil N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)
71 acetamide;
72 (yy) Ortho-fluorofentanyl (N-2-(1-phenethylpiperidin-yl)propionamide); other name
73 2-fluorofentanyl;
74 (zz) para-fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)
75 butyramide;
76 (aaa) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl)
77 propanamide);
78 (bbb) PEPAP (1-(2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);
79 (ccc) Phenadoxone;
80 (ddd) Phenampromide;
81 (eee) Phenomorphan;
82 (fff) Phenoperidine;
83 (ggg) Piritramide;
84 (hhh) Proheptazine;
85 (iii) Properidine;
86 (jjj) Propiram;
87 (kkk) Racemoramide;
88 (lll) Tetrahydrofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
89 phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carboxamide);

HB 1881 4
90 (mmm) Thiofentanyl (-phenyl-N-(1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl)-propanamide);
91 (nnn) Tilidine;
92 (ooo) Trimeperidine;
93 (3) Any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers
94 unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of
95 isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
96 (a) Acetorphine;
97 (b) Acetyldihydrocodeine;
98 (c) Benzylmorphine;
99 (d) Codeine methylbromide;
100 (e) Codeine-N-Oxide;
101 (f) Cyprenorphine;
102 (g) Desomorphine;
103 (h) Dihydromorphine;
104 (i) Drotebanol;
105 (j) Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt);
106 (k) Heroin;
107 (l) Hydromorphinol;
108 (m) Methyldesorphine;
109 (n) Methyldihydromorphine;
110 (o) Morphine methylbromide;
111 (p) Morphine methylsulfonate;
112 (q) Morphine-N-Oxide;
113 (r) Myrophine;
114 (s) Nicocodeine;
115 (t) Nicomorphine;
116 (u) Normorphine;
117 (v) Pholcodine;
118 (w) Thebacon;
119 (4) Any of the following opiate similar synthetic substances scheduled by the U.S.
120 Drug Enforcement Administration as substances that share a pharmacological profile similar
121 to fentanyl, morphine, and other synthetic opioids, unless specifically excepted or unless
122 listed in another schedule:
123 (a) Butyryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutyramide);
124 (b) U-47700 (3,4-Dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino) cyclohexyl]–methyl benzamide).
125 (5) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of
126 the following hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers, unless

HB 1881 5
127 specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
128 possible within the specific chemical designation:
129 (a) Alpha-ethyltryptamine;
130 (b) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
131 (c) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine;
132 (d) 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
133 (e) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine;
134 (f) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine;
135 (g) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl) ethanamine;
136 (h) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl) ethanamine;
137 (i) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl) ethanamine;
138 (j) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl) ethanamine;
139 (k) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
140 (l) 2-(4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
141 (m) 2-(4-Ethylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
142 (n) 2-(4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
143 (o) 2-(4-(Isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
144 (p) 4-methoxyamphetamine;
145 (q) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
146 (r) 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
147 (s) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
148 (t) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine;
149 (u) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine;
150 (v) N-hydroxy-3, 4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
151 (w) 3,4,5-trimethoxyamphetamine;
152 (x) 5-MeO-DMT or 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine;
153 (y) Alpha-methyltryptamine;
154 (z) Bufotenine;
155 (aa) Diethyltryptamine;
156 (bb) Dimethyltryptamine;
157 (cc) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine;
158 (dd) Ibogaine;
159 (ee) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
160 (ff) Marijuana or marihuana, except industrial hemp;
161 (gg) Mescaline;
162 (hh) Parahexyl;

HB 1881 6
163 (ii) Peyote, to include all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as
164 Lophophora williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; any extract from
165 any part of such plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or
166 preparation of the plant, its seed or extracts;
167 (jj) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
168 (kk) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
169 (ll) Psilocybin;
170 (mm) Psilocyn;
171 (nn) Tetrahydrocannabinols naturally contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis
172 (cannabis plant), except industrial hemp, as well as synthetic equivalents of the substances
173 contained in the cannabis plant, or in the resinous extractives of such plant, or synthetic
174 substances, derivatives and their isomers, or both, with similar chemical structure and
175 pharmacological activity to those substances contained in the plant, such as the following:
176 a. 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers;
177 b. 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers;
178 c. 3,4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers;
179 d. Any compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic
180 positions covered;
181 (oo) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine;
182 (pp) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine;
183 (qq) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine;
184 (rr) 1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine;
185 (ss) Salvia divinorum;
186 (tt) Salvinorin A;
187 (uu) Synthetic cannabinoids:
188 a. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole or 1H-indol-3-yl-
189 (1-naphthyl)methane by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl,
190 haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-
191 (4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent,
192 whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Including, but not limited to:
193 (i) AM2201, or 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
194 (ii) JWH-007, or 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
195 (iii) JWH-015, or 1-propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
196 (iv) JWH-018, or 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
197 (v) JWH-019, or 1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
198 (vi) JWH-073, or 1-butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
199 (vii) JWH-081, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole;

HB 1881 7
200 (viii) JWH-098, or 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole;
201 (ix) JWH-122, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole;
202 (x) JWH-164, or 1-pentyl-3-(7-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole;
203 (xi) JWH-200, or 1-(2-(4-(morpholinyl)ethyl))-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
204 (xii) JWH-210, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-naphthoyl)indole;
205 (xiii) JWH-398, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole;
206 b. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole by substitution at
207 the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
208 cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether
209 or not further substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in the
210 naphthyl ring to any extent;
211 c. Any compound structurally derived from 1-(1-naphthylmethyl)indene by
212 substitution at the 3-position of the indene ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
213 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)
214 ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent, whether or not
215 substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent;
216 d. Any compound structurally derived from 3-phenylacetylindole by substitution at
217 the nitrogen atom of the indole ring with alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
218 cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether
219 or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in the
220 phenyl ring to any extent. Including, but not limited to:
221 (i) JWH-201, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole;
222 (ii) JWH-203, or 1-pentyl-3-(2-chlorophenylacetyl)indole;
223 (iii) JWH-250, or 1-pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole;
224 (iv) JWH-251, or 1-pentyl-3-(2-methylphenylacetyl)indole;
225 (v) RCS-8, or 1-(2-cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole;
226 e. Any compound structurally derived from 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol by
227 substitution at the 5-position of the phenolic ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
228 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)
229 ethyl group, whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Including, but
230 not limited to CP 47, 497 and homologues, or 2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-
231 methyloctan-2-yl)phenol, where side chain n=5, and homologues where side chain n-4,6, or
232 7;
233 f. Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole structure with substitution at the
234 nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
235 cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group,

HB 1881 8
236 whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
237 substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. Including, but not limited to:
238 (i) AM-694, or 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole;
239 (ii) RCS-4, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole (SR-19 and RCS-4);
240 g. CP 50,556-1, or [(6S,6aR,9R,10aR)-9-hydroxy-6-methyl-3-[(2R)-5-phenylpentan-
241 2-yl] oxy-5,6,6a,7,8,9,10,10a-octahydrophenanthridin-1-yl] acetate;
242 h. HU-210, or (6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-
243 6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol;
244 i. HU-211, or Dexanabinol,(6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-
245 methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol;
246 j. Dimethylheptylpyran, or DMHP;
247 (6) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity of the
248 following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including their
249 salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of
250 isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
251 (a) Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid;
252 (b) Mecloqualone;
253 (c) Methaqualone;
254 (7) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity of the
255 following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including their
256 salts, isomers and salts of isomers:
257 (a) Aminorex;
258 (b) N-benzylpiperazine;
259 (c) Cathinone;
260 (d) Fenethylline;
261 (e) 3-Fluoromethcathinone;
262 (f) 4-Fluoromethcathinone;
263 (g) Mephedrone, or 4-methylmethcathinone;
264 (h) Methcathinone;
265 (i) 4-methoxymethcathinone;
266 (j) (+,-)cis-4-methylaminorex ((+,-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-
267 oxazolamine);
268 (k) Methylenedioxypyrovalerone, MDPV, or 1-(1,3-Benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(1-
269 pyrrolidinyl)-1-pentanone;
270 (l) Methylone, or 3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone;
271 (m) 4-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone, or MPBP;
272 (n) N-ethylamphetamine;

HB 1881 9
273 (o) N,N-dimethylamphetamine;
274 (p) Quinolin-8-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxylate (PB-22; QUPIC);
275 (q) Quinolin-8-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate (5-fluoro-PB-22; 5F-
276 PB-22);
277 (r) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
278 carboxamide (AB-FUBINACA);
279 (s) N-(1-amino-3, 3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide
280 (ADB-PINACA);
281 (8) A temporary listing of substances subject to emergency scheduling under federal
282 law shall include any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any
283 quantity of the following substances:
284 (a) (1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone, its optical,
285 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
286 (b) [1-(5-fluoro-pentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl](2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone,
287 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
288 (c) N-(1-adamantyl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical, positional, and
289 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
290 (d) 2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, its optical,
291 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
292 (e) 2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, its optical,
293 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
294 (f) 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, its optical,
295 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
296 (g) 4-methyl-N-ethylcathinone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts,
297 and salts of isomers;
298 (h) 4-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric
299 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
300 (i) Alpha-pyrrolidinopentiophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers,
301 salts, and salts of isomers;
302 (j) Butylone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
303 (k) Pentedrone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
304 isomers;
305 (l) Pentylone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
306 isomers;
307 (m) Naphyrone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
308 isomers;

HB 1881 10
309 (n) Alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers,
310 salts, and salts of isomers;
311 (o) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indazole-3-
312 carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
313 (p) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its
314 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
315 (q) [1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-yl](naphthalen-1-yl)methanone, its optical,
316 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
317 (r) N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl) ethyl]piperidin-4-yl]-N-phenylpropionamide,
318 its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
319 (s) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide, its optical, positional, and
320 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
321 (t) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indazole-3-
322 carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
323 (u) methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
324 dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
325 (v) methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate, its
326 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
327 (w) N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical,
328 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
329 (x) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
330 carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
331 (y) methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
332 dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
333 (z) methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
334 dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
335 (aa) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide, its isomers,
336 esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
337 (bb) methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate,
338 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
339 (cc) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide, its isomers,
340 esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
341 (dd) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpentanamide, its isomers, esters, ethers,
342 salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
343 (ee) N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide, its isomers, esters,
344 ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;

HB 1881 11
345 (ff) N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide, its isomers,
346 esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
347 (gg) N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide, its isomers,
348 esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
349 (hh) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide, its isomers, esters,
350 ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
351 (ii) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide, its isomers,
352 esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
353 (jj) Fentanyl-related substances, their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of
354 isomers, esters, and ethers. Fentanyl-related substance shall mean any substance not
355 otherwise listed under another Drug Enforcement Administration Controlled Substance Code
356 Number, and for which no exemption or approval is in effect under section 505 of the Federal
357 Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Section 355, that is structurally related to fentanyl
358 by one or more of the following modifications:
359 a. Replacement of the phenyl portion of the phenethyl group by any monocycle,
360 whether or not further substituted in or on the monocycle;
361 b. Substitution in or on the phenethyl group with alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, hydroxyl,
362 halo, haloalkyl, amino or nitro groups;
363 c. Substitution in or on the piperidine ring with alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, ester, ether,
364 hydroxyl, amino or nitro groups;
365 d. Replacement of the aniline ring with any aromatic monocycle, whether or not
366 further substituted in or on the aromatic monocycle; or
367 e. Replacement of the N-propionyl group by another acyl group;
368 (kk) Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate, its optical,
369 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (NM2201; CBL2201);
370 (ll) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
371 carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (5F-
372 AB-PINACA);
373 (mm) 1-(4-cyanobutyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its
374 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (4-CN-CUMYL-
375 BUTINACA; 4-cyano-CUMYL-BUTINACA; 4-CN-CUMYLBINACA; CUMYL-4CN-
376 BINACA; SGT-78);
377 (nn) methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate,
378 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (MMB-CHMICA,
379 AMB-CHMICA);

HB 1881 12
380 (oo) 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-pyrrolo[2,3-b]pyridine-3-
381 carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (5F-
382 CUMYL-P7AICA);
383 (pp) N-ethylpentylone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts
384 of isomers (ephylone, 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)-pentan-1-one);
385 (qq) ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate,
386 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial name: 5F-
387 EDMB-PINACA);
388 (rr) methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate,
389 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial name: 5F-
390 MDMB-PICA);
391 (ss) N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical,
392 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial names: FUB-AKB48;
393 FUB-APINACA; AKB48 N-(4-FLUOROBENZYL));
394 (tt) 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its
395 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial names: 5F-
396 CUMYL-PINACA; SGT-25);
397 (uu) (1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl) methanone,
398 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial name: FUB-
399 144);
400 (vv) N-ethylhexedrone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts
401 of isomers (Other name: 2-(ethylamino)-1-phenylhexan-1-one);
402 (ww) alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers,
403 salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: α-PHP; alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone; 1-phenyl-2-
404 (pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one);
405 (xx) 4-methyl-alpha-ethylaminopentiophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric
406 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers; (Other names: 4-MEAP; 2-(ethylamino)-1-(4-
407 methylphenyl)pentan-1-one);
408 (yy) 4'-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric
409 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: MPHP; 4'-methyl-alpha-
410 pyrrolidinohexanophenone; 1-(4-methylphenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one);
411 (zz) alpha-pyrrolidinoheptaphenone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers,
412 salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: PV8; 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)heptan-1-one);
413 (aaa) 4'-chloro-alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric
414 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: 4-chloro-α-PVP; 4'-chloro-alpha-
415 pyrrolidinopentiophenone; 1-(4-chlorophenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one);

HB 1881 13
416 (9) Khat, to include all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as catha
417 edulis, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; any extract from any part of such plant; and
418 every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seed or
419 extracts.
420 3. The department of health and senior services shall place a substance in Schedule II
421 if it finds that:
422 (1) The substance has high potential for abuse;
423 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United
424 States, or currently accepted medical use with severe restrictions; and
425 (3) The abuse of the substance may lead to severe psychic or physical dependence.
426 4. The controlled substances listed in this subsection are included in Schedule II:
427 (1) Any of the following substances whether produced directly or indirectly by
428 extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical
429 synthesis, or by combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
430 (a) Opium and opiate; and any salt, compound, derivative or preparation of opium or
431 opiate, excluding apomorphine, thebaine-derived butorphanol, dextrorphan, nalbuphine,
432 nalmefene, naloxegol, naloxone, and naltrexone, and their respective salts, but including the
433 following:
434 a. Raw opium;
435 b. Opium extracts;
436 c. Opium fluid;
437 d. Powdered opium;
438 e. Granulated opium;
439 f. Tincture of opium;
440 g. Codeine;
441 h. Dihydroetorphine;
442 i. Ethylmorphine;
443 j. Etorphine hydrochloride;
444 k. Hydrocodone;
445 l. Hydromorphone;
446 m. Metopon;
447 n. Morphine;
448 o. Oripavine;
449 p. Oxycodone;
450 q. Oxymorphone;
451 r. Thebaine;

HB 1881 14
452 (b) Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically
453 equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in this subdivision, but not
454 including the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;
455 (c) Opium poppy and poppy straw;
456 (d) Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves, and
457 any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or
458 identical with any of these substances, but not including the following:
459 a. Decocainized coca leaves or extractions of coca leaves, which extractions do not
460 contain cocaine or ecgonine; or
461 b. Ioflupane;
462 (e) Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of poppy straw in either liquid,
463 solid or powder form which contains the phenanthrene alkaloids of the opium poppy);
464 (2) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
465 salts of isomers, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible
466 within the specific chemical designation, dextrorphan and levopropoxyphene excepted:
467 (a) Alfentanil;
468 (b) Alphaprodine;
469 (c) Anileridine;
470 (d) Bezitramide;
471 (e) Bulk dextropropoxyphene;
472 (f) Carfentanil;
473 (g) Dihydrocodeine;
474 (h) Diphenoxylate;
475 (i) Fentanyl;
476 (j) Isomethadone;
477 (k) Levo-alphacetylmethadol;
478 (l) Levomethorphan;
479 (m) Levorphanol;
480 (n) Metazocine;
481 (o) Methadone;
482 (p) Methadone-Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4, 4-diphenylbutane;
483 (q) Moramide-Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-diphenylpropane-
484 carboxylic acid;
485 (r) Pethidine (meperidine);
486 (s) Pethidine-Intermediate-A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine;
487 (t) Pethidine-Intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate;
488 (u) Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperdine-4-carboxylic acid;

HB 1881 15
489 (v) Phenazocine;
490 (w) Piminodine;
491 (x) Racemethorphan;
492 (y) Racemorphan;
493 (z) Remifentanil;
494 (aa) Sufentanil;
495 (bb) Tapentadol;
496 (cc) Thiafentanil;
497 (3) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
498 the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system:
499 (a) Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical isomers;
500 (b) Lisdexamfetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;
501 (c) Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;
502 (d) Phenmetrazine and its salts;
503 (e) Methylphenidate;
504 (4) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
505 the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including
506 its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts
507 of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
508 (a) Amobarbital;
509 (b) Glutethimide;
510 (c) Pentobarbital;
511 (d) Phencyclidine;
512 (e) Secobarbital;
513 (5) Hallucinogenic substances:
514 (a) Any material or compound which contains any quantity of nabilone;
515 (b) Dronabinol [(-)-Δ-9-trans tetrahydrocannabinol] in an oral solution in a drug
516 product approved for marketing by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration;
517 (6) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
518 the following substances:
519 (a) Immediate precursor to amphetamine and methamphetamine: Phenylacetone;
520 (b) Immediate precursors to phencyclidine (PCP):
521 a. 1-phenylcyclohexylamine;
522 b. 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC);
523 (c) Immediate precursor to fentanyl: 4-anilino-N-phenethyl-4-piperidine (ANPP);
524 (7) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
525 the following alkyl nitrites:

HB 1881 16
526 (a) Amyl nitrite;
527 (b) Butyl nitrite.
528 5. The department of health and senior services shall place a substance in Schedule III
529 if it finds that:
530 (1) The substance has a potential for abuse less than the substances listed in
531 Schedules I and II;
532 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United
533 States; and
534 (3) Abuse of the substance may lead to moderate or low physical dependence or high
535 psychological dependence.
536 6. The controlled substances listed in this subsection are included in Schedule III:
537 (1) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
538 the following substances having a potential for abuse associated with a stimulant effect on the
539 central nervous system:
540 (a) Benzphetamine;
541 (b) Chlorphentermine;
542 (c) Clortermine;
543 (d) Phendimetrazine;
544 (2) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity or
545 salt of the following substances or salts having a depressant effect on the central nervous
546 system:
547 (a) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity or
548 salt of the following substances combined with one or more active medicinal ingredients:
549 a. Amobarbital;
550 b. Secobarbital;
551 c. Pentobarbital;
552 (b) Any suppository dosage form containing any quantity or salt of the following:
553 a. Amobarbital;
554 b. Secobarbital;
555 c. Pentobarbital;
556 (c) Any substance which contains any quantity of a derivative of barbituric acid or its
557 salt;
558 (d) Chlorhexadol;
559 (e) Embutramide;
560 (f) Gamma hydroxybutyric acid and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers contained
561 in a drug product for which an application has been approved under Section 505 of the federal
562 Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

HB 1881 17
563 (g) Ketamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
564 (h) Lysergic acid;
565 (i) Lysergic acid amide;
566 (j) Methyprylon;
567 (k) Perampanel, and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
568 (l) Sulfondiethylmethane;
569 (m) Sulfonethylmethane;
570 (n) Sulfonmethane;
571 (o) Tiletamine and zolazepam or any salt thereof;
572 (3) Nalorphine;
573 (4) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing limited quantities of
574 any of the following narcotic drugs or their salts:
575 (a) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per one hundred milliliters or not more than
576 ninety milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline
577 alkaloid of opium;
578 (b) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per one hundred milliliters or not more than
579 ninety milligrams per dosage unit with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in
580 recognized therapeutic amounts;
581 (c) Not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per one hundred milliliters or not
582 more than ninety milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients
583 in recognized therapeutic amounts;
584 (d) Not more than three hundred milligrams of ethylmorphine per one hundred
585 milliliters or not more than fifteen milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active,
586 nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
587 (e) Not more than five hundred milligrams of opium per one hundred milliliters or per
588 one hundred grams or not more than twenty-five milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more
589 active nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
590 (f) Not more than fifty milligrams of morphine per one hundred milliliters or per one
591 hundred grams, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic
592 amounts;
593 (5) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following
594 narcotic drugs or their salts: Buprenorphine;
595 (6) Anabolic steroids. Any drug or hormonal substance, chemically and
596 pharmacologically related to testosterone (other than estrogens, progestins, corticosteroids,
597 and dehydroepiandrosterone) that promotes muscle growth, except an anabolic steroid which
598 is expressly intended for administration through implants to cattle or other nonhuman species
599 and which has been approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services for that

HB 1881 18
600 administration. If any person prescribes, dispenses, or distributes such steroid for human use,
601 such person shall be considered to have prescribed, dispensed, or distributed an anabolic
602 steroid within the meaning of this subdivision. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed
603 in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity
604 of the following substances, including its salts, esters and ethers:
605 (a) 3ß,17ß-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
606 (b) 3α,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
607 (c) 5α-androstan-3,17-dione;
608 (d) 1-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androst-1-ene);
609 (e) 1-androstenediol (3α,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androst-1-ene);
610 (f) 4-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxy-androst-4-ene);
611 (g) 5-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene);
612 (h) 1-androstenedione ([5α]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione);
613 (i) 4-androstenedione (androst-4-en-3,17-dione);
614 (j) 5-androstenedione (androst-5-en-3,17-dione);
615 (k) Bolasterone (7α, 17α-dimethyl-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
616 (l) Boldenone (17β-hydroxyandrost-1,4,-diene-3-one);
617 (m) Boldione;
618 (n) Calusterone (7β, 17α-dimethyl-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
619 (o) Clostebol (4-chloro-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
620 (p) Dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro-17β-hydroxy-17α-methyl-androst-
621 1,4-dien-3-one);
622 (q) Desoxymethyltestosterone;
623 (r) 4-dihydrotestosterone (17ß-hydroxy-androstan-3-one);
624 (s) Drostanolone (17ß-hydroxy-2α-methyl-5α-androstan-3-one);
625 (t) Ethylestrenol (17α-ethyl-17ß-hydroxyestr-4-ene);
626 (u) Fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17α-methyl-11ß,17ß-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
627 (v) Formebolone (2-formyl-17α-methyl-11α,17ß-dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);
628 (w) Furazabol (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-furazan);
629 (x) 13ß-ethyl-17ß-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one;
630 (y) 4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17ß-dihydroxy-androst-4-en-3-one);
631 (z) 4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17ß-dihydroxy-estr-4-en-3-one);
632 (aa) Mestanolone (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxy-5α-androstan-3-one);
633 (bb) Mesterolone (1α- methyl-17ß-hydroxy-[5α]-androstan-3-one);
634 (cc) Methandienone (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);
635 (dd) Methandriol (17α-methyl-3ß,17ß-dihydroxyandrost-5-ene);
636 (ee) Methasterone (2α,17α-dimethyl-5α-androstan-17β-ol-3-one);

HB 1881 19
637 (ff) Methenolone (1-methyl-17ß-hydroxy-5α-androst-1-en-3-one);
638 (gg) 17α-methyl-3β,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
639 (hh) 17α-methyl-3α,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
640 (ii) 17α-methyl-3β,17β-dihydroxyandrost-4-ene;
641 (jj) 17α-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17α-methyl-4-hydroxy-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-
642 3-one);
643 (kk) Methyldienolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyestra-4,9(10)-dien-3-one);
644 (ll) Methyltrienolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyestra-4,9,11-trien-3-one);
645 (mm) Methyltestosterone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
646 (nn) Mibolerone (7α,17α-dimethyl-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
647 (oo) 17α-methyl-Δ1-dihydrotestosterone (17β-hydroxy-17α-methyl-5α-androst-1-en-
648 3-one) (a.k.a. '17-α-methyl-1-testosterone');
649 (pp) Nandrolone (17β-hydroxyestr-4-ene-3-one);
650 (qq) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);
651 (rr) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3α,17β-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);
652 (ss) 19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione (estra-4,9(10)-diene-3,17-dione);
653 (tt) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxyestr-5-ene);
654 (uu) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3α,17β-dihydroxyestr-5-ene);
655 (vv) 19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4-en-3,17-dione);
656 (ww) 19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5-en-3,17-dione);
657 (xx) Norbolethone (13β,17α-diethyl-17β-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one);
658 (yy) Norclostebol (4-chloro-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
659 (zz) Norethandrolone (17α-ethyl-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
660 (aaa) Normethandrolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
661 (bbb) Oxandrolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxy-2-oxa-[5α]-androstan-3-one);
662 (ccc) Oxymesterone (17α-methyl-4,17β-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
663 (ddd) metholone (17α-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene-17β-hydroxy-[5α]-androstan-3-
664 one);
665 (eee) Prostanozol (17β-hydroxy-5α-androstano[3,2-c]pyrazole);
666 (fff) Stanolone (Δ1-dihydrotestosterone (a.k.a. 1-testosterone)(17β-hydroxy-5α-
667 androst-1-en-3-one));
668 (ggg) Stanozolol (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxy-[5α]-androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole);
669 (hhh) Stenbolone (17ß-hydroxy-2-methyl-[5α]-androst-1-en-3-one);
670 (iii) Testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17-secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-oic acid
671 lactone);
672 (jjj) Testosterone (17ß-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
673 (kkk) Tetrahydrogestrinone (13ß,17α-diethyl-17ß-hydroxygon-4,9,11-trien-3-one);

HB 1881 20
674 (lll) Trenbolone (17ß-hydroxyestr-4,9,11-trien-3-one);
675 (mmm) Any salt, ester, or ether of a drug or substance described or listed in this
676 subdivision, except an anabolic steroid which is expressly intended for administration through
677 implants to cattle or other nonhuman species and which has been approved by the Secretary
678 of Health and Human Services for that administration;
679 (7) Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a
680 United States Food and Drug Administration approved drug product;
681 (8) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains xylazine,
682 except in the following cases:
683 (a) Dispensing, prescribing, or administering to an animal a drug containing
684 xylazine that has been approved by the United States Secretary of Health and Human
685 Services under 21 U.S.C. Section 360b (January 1, 2026);
686 (b) Dispensing, prescribing, or administering xylazine to an animal that is
687 permissible under 21 U.S.C. Section 360b(a)(4) (January 1, 2026);
688 (c) Manufacturing, distributing, or using xylazine as an active pharmaceutical
689 ingredient for manufacturing an animal drug:
690 a. Approved under 21 U.S.C. Section 360b (January 1, 2026); or
691 b. Issued an investigation use exemption under 21 U.S.C. Section 360b(j)
692 (January 1, 2026);
693 (d) Manufacturing, distributing, or using a xylazine bulk chemical for
694 pharmaceutical compounding by a licensed pharmacist or veterinarian; or
695 (e) Any other use approved or permissible under 21 U.S.C. Section 301 et seq.
696 (January 1, 2026);
697 (9) The department of health and senior services may except by rule any compound,
698 mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant or depressant substance listed in
699 subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection from the application of all or any part of
700 sections 195.010 to 195.320 if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one or more
701 active medicinal ingredients not having a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous
702 system, and if the admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or
703 concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a stimulant or
704 depressant effect on the central nervous system.
705 7. The department of health and senior services shall place a substance in Schedule
706 IV if it finds that:
707 (1) The substance has a low potential for abuse relative to substances in Schedule III;
708 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United
709 States; and

HB 1881 21
710 (3) Abuse of the substance may lead to limited physical dependence or psychological
711 dependence relative to the substances in Schedule III.
712 8. The controlled substances listed in this subsection are included in Schedule IV:
713 (1) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following
714 narcotic drugs or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited
715 quantities as set forth below:
716 (a) Not more than one milligram of difenoxin and not less than twenty-five
717 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;
718 (b) Dextropropoxyphene (alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino-1, 2-diphenyl-3-methyl-2-
719 propionoxybutane);
720 (c) 2-[(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol, its salts, optical
721 and geometric isomers, and salts of these isomers (including tramadol);
722 (d) Any of the following limited quantities of narcotic drugs or their salts, which shall
723 include one or more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to
724 confer upon the compound, mixture or preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than
725 those possessed by the narcotic drug alone:
726 a. Not more than two hundred milligrams of codeine per one hundred milliliters or
727 per one hundred grams;
728 b. Not more than one hundred milligrams of dihydrocodeine per one hundred
729 milliliters or per one hundred grams;
730 c. Not more than one hundred milligrams of ethylmorphine per one hundred
731 milliliters or per one hundred grams;
732 (2) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity of the
733 following substances, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the
734 existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
735 designation:
736 (a) Alfaxalone;
737 (b) Alprazolam;
738 (c) Barbital;
739 (d) Bromazepam;
740 (e) Camazepam;
741 (f) Carisoprodol;
742 (g) Chloral betaine;
743 (h) Chloral hydrate;
744 (i) Chlordiazepoxide;
745 (j) Clobazam;
746 (k) Clonazepam;

HB 1881 22
747 (l) Clorazepate;
748 (m) Clotiazepam;
749 (n) Cloxazolam;
750 (o) Delorazepam;
751 (p) Diazepam;
752 (q) Dichloralphenazone;
753 (r) Estazolam;
754 (s) Ethchlorvynol;
755 (t) Ethinamate;
756 (u) Ethyl loflazepate;
757 (v) Fludiazepam;
758 (w) Flunitrazepam;
759 (x) Flurazepam;
760 (y) Fospropofol;
761 (z) Halazepam;
762 (aa) Haloxazolam;
763 (bb) Ketazolam;
764 (cc) Loprazolam;
765 (dd) Lorazepam;
766 (ee) Lormetazepam;
767 (ff) Mebutamate;
768 (gg) Medazepam;
769 (hh) Meprobamate;
770 (ii) Methohexital;
771 (jj) Methylphenobarbital (mephobarbital);
772 (kk) Midazolam;
773 (ll) Nimetazepam;
774 (mm) Nitrazepam;
775 (nn) Nordiazepam;
776 (oo) Oxazepam;
777 (pp) Oxazolam;
778 (qq) Paraldehyde;
779 (rr) Petrichloral;
780 (ss) Phenobarbital;
781 (tt) Pinazepam;
782 (uu) Prazepam;
783 (vv) Quazepam;

HB 1881 23
784 (ww) Suvorexant;
785 (xx) Temazepam;
786 (yy) Tetrazepam;
787 (zz) Triazolam;
788 (aaa) Zaleplon;
789 (bbb) Zolpidem;
790 (ccc) Zopiclone;
791 (3) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
792 the following substance including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever the
793 existence of such salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible: fenfluramine;
794 (4) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
795 the following substances, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the
796 existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible: Lorcaserin;
797 (5) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity of the
798 following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including their
799 salts, isomers and salts of isomers:
800 (a) Cathine ((+)-norpseudoephedrine);
801 (b) Diethylpropion;
802 (c) Fencamfamin;
803 (d) Fenproporex;
804 (e) Mazindol;
805 (f) Mefenorex;
806 (g) Modafinil;
807 (h) Pemoline, including organometallic complexes and chelates thereof;
808 (i) Phentermine;
809 (j) Pipradrol;
810 (k) Sibutramine;
811 (l) SPA ((-)-1-dimethyamino-1,2-diphenylethane);
812 (6) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity of the
813 following substance, including its salts:
814 (a) Butorphanol (including its optical isomers);
815 (b) Eluxadoline (5-[[[(2S)-2-amino-3-[4-aminocarbonyl)-2,6-dimethylphenyl]-1-
816 oxopropyl][(1S)-1-(4-phenyl-1 H-imidazol-2-yl)ethyl]amino]methyl]-2-methoxybenzoic
817 acid) (including its optical isomers) and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
818 (c) Pentazocine;
819 (7) Ephedrine, its salts, optical isomers and salts of optical isomers, when the
820 substance is the only active medicinal ingredient;

HB 1881 24
821 (8) The department of health and senior services may except by rule any compound,
822 mixture, or preparation containing any depressant substance listed in subdivision (1) of this
823 subsection from the application of all or any part of sections 195.010 to 195.320 and sections
824 579.015 to 579.086 if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one or more active
825 medicinal ingredients not having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the
826 admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that
827 vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a depressant effect on the central
828 nervous system.
829 9. The department of health and senior services shall place a substance in Schedule V
830 if it finds that:
831 (1) The substance has low potential for abuse relative to the controlled substances
832 listed in Schedule IV;
833 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United
834 States; and
835 (3) The substance has limited physical dependence or psychological dependence
836 liability relative to the controlled substances listed in Schedule IV.
837 10. The controlled substances listed in this subsection are included in Schedule V:
838 (1) Any compound, mixture or preparation containing any of the following narcotic
839 drugs or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as
840 set forth below, which also contains one or more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in
841 sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture or preparation valuable medicinal
842 qualities other than those possessed by the narcotic drug alone:
843 (a) Not more than two and five-tenths milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than
844 twenty-five micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;
845 (b) Not more than one hundred milligrams of opium per one hundred milliliters or per
846 one hundred grams;
847 (c) Not more than five-tenths milligram of difenoxin and not less than twenty-five
848 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;
849 (2) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of
850 the following substance having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system including its
851 salts, isomers and salts of isomers: pyrovalerone;
852 (3) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any detectable quantity of
853 pseudoephedrine or its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers or any compound,
854 mixture, or preparation containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine or its salts or optical
855 isomers, or salts of optical isomers;

HB 1881 25
856 (4) Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another schedule, any
857 material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following
858 substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts:
859 (a) Brivaracetam ((25)-2-[(4R)-2-oxo-4-propylpyrrolidin-1-yl]butanamide) (also
860 referred to as BRV; UCB-34714; Briviact);
861 (b) Ezogabine [N-[2-amino-4(4-fluorobenzylamino)-phenyl]-carbamic acid ethyl
862 ester];
863 (c) Lacosamide [(R)-2-acetoamido-N-benzyl-3-methoxy-propionamide];
864 (d) Pregabalin [(S)-3-(aminomethyl)-5-methylhexanoic acid];
865 (5) Any drug product in finished dosage formulation that has been approved by the
866 U.S. Food and Drug Administration that contains cannabidiol (2-[1R-3-methyl-6R-(1-
867 methylethenyl)-2-cyclohexen-1-yl]-5-pentyl-1,3-benzenediol) derived from cannabis and no
868 more than 0.1 percent (w/w) residual tetrahydro cannabinols.
869 11. If any compound, mixture, or preparation as specified in subdivision (3) of
870 subsection 10 of this section is dispensed, sold, or distributed in a pharmacy without a
871 prescription:
872 (1) All packages of any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any detectable
873 quantity of pseudoephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers or
874 ephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, shall be offered for sale only
875 from behind a pharmacy counter where the public is not permitted, and only by a registered
876 pharmacist or registered pharmacy technician; and
877 (2) Any person purchasing, receiving or otherwise acquiring any compound, mixture,
878 or preparation containing any detectable quantity of pseudoephedrine, its salts or optical
879 isomers, or salts of optical isomers or ephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical
880 isomers shall be at least eighteen years of age; and
881 (3) The pharmacist, intern pharmacist, or registered pharmacy technician shall require
882 any person, prior to such person's purchasing, receiving or otherwise acquiring such
883 compound, mixture, or preparation to furnish suitable photo identification that is issued by a
884 state or the federal government or a document that, with respect to identification, is
885 considered acceptable and showing the date of birth of the person;
886 (4) The seller shall deliver the product directly into the custody of the purchaser.
887 12. Pharmacists, intern pharmacists, and registered pharmacy technicians shall
888 implement and maintain an electronic log of each transaction. Such log shall include the
889 following information:
890 (1) The name, address, and signature of the purchaser;
891 (2) The amount of the compound, mixture, or preparation purchased;
892 (3) The date and time of each purchase; and

HB 1881 26
893 (4) The name or initials of the pharmacist, intern pharmacist, or registered pharmacy
894 technician who dispensed the compound, mixture, or preparation to the purchaser.
895 13. Each pharmacy shall submit information regarding sales of any compound,
896 mixture, or preparation as specified in subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this section in
897 accordance with transmission methods and frequency established by the department by
898 regulation;
899 14. No person shall dispense, sell, purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire quantities
900 greater than those specified in this chapter.
901 15. All persons who dispense or offer for sale pseudoephedrine and ephedrine
902 products in a pharmacy shall ensure that all such products are located only behind a pharmacy
903 counter where the public is not permitted.
904 16. The penalties for a knowing or reckless violation of the provisions of subsections
905 11 to 15 of this section are found in section 579.060.
906 17. The scheduling of substances specified in subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this
907 section and subsections 11, 12, 14, and 15 of this section shall not apply to any compounds,
908 mixtures, or preparations that are in liquid or liquid-filled gel capsule form or to any
909 compound, mixture, or preparation specified in subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this
910 section which must be dispensed, sold, or distributed in a pharmacy pursuant to a
911 prescription.
912 18. The manufacturer of a drug product or another interested party may apply with
913 the department of health and senior services for an exemption from this section. The
914 department of health and senior services may grant an exemption by rule from this section if
915 the department finds the drug product is not used in the illegal manufacture of
916 methamphetamine or other controlled or dangerous substances. The department of health
917 and senior services shall rely on reports from law enforcement and law enforcement
918 evidentiary laboratories in determining if the proposed product can be used to manufacture
919 illicit controlled substances.
920 19. The department of health and senior services shall revise and republish the
921 schedules annually.
922 20. The department of health and senior services shall promulgate rules under chapter
923 536 regarding the security and storage of Schedule V controlled substances, as described in
924 subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this section, for distributors as registered by the
925 department of health and senior services.

HB 1881 27
926 21. Logs of transactions required to be kept and maintained by this section and
927 section 195.417 shall create a rebuttable presumption that the person whose name appears in
928 the logs is the person whose transactions are recorded in the logs.
✔